test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-gieresvuohta_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - gieres: # root for agent-noun (CG and VH)
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Sg+Nom: gieresvuohta
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Sg+Gen: gieresvuoda
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Sg+Acc: gieresvuodav
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Sg+Ill: gieresvuohtaj
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Sg+Ine: gieresvuodan
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Sg+Ela: [gieresvuodast, gieresvuodas]
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Sg+Com: [gieresvuodajn, gieresvuodajna]
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Pl+Nom: gieresvuoda
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Pl+Gen: gieresvuodaj
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Pl+Acc: gieresvuodajd
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Pl+Ill: gieresvuodajda
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Pl+Ine: gieresvuodajn
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Pl+Ela: [gieresvuodajst, gieresvuodajs]
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Pl+Com: [gieresvuodaj, gieresvuodajgum]
    gieres+N+Der/State+N+Ess: gieresvuohtan
 
 
